Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.110

Sale or transfer of shares.

No shareholder of a corporation organized as a professional corporation may sell or transfer his or her shares in such corporation except to the trustee of a qualified trust or another individual who is eligible to be a shareholder of such corporation. Any transfer of shares in violation of this section shall be void. However, nothing in this section prohibits the transfer of shares of a professional corporation by operation of law or court decree.

[ 1997 c 18 s 4; 1983 c 51 s 5; 1969 c 122 s 11.]